West Virginia, session 2026, HB5633.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 26. Herbert Henderson Office on Minority Affairs. §5-26-3. Establishment of a community-based pilot project. (a) The office shall establish a community-based pilot project. The pilot expires on July 1, 2021 2031. The pilot shall develop a model to promote public health through comprehensive community development in communities across West Virginia.  This model shall address poverty, substance abuse and other social determinants of health; improve community and populations’ health; improve labor force participation; and support economic development through comprehensive community development in rural, suburban and urban communities.  (b) As selected by the executive director, the pilot shall include a collaborative of nonprofit organizations.(c) The pilot shall be funded by coordinating existing funded projects. The pilot shall leverage existing resources, including housing and urban development services provided by the federal government and any youth, education and family services offered by the state government or other local organizations. If funds are available, the pilot project may receive funding from the office.  (d) The office shall report to the Select Committee on Minority Affairs Interim Committee on the efforts and progress of the pilot program.